New York, session 2025-2026, S3368.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivisions 4 and 14 of section 854 of the general munici- 2 pal law, subdivision 4 as amended by section 5 of part X of chapter 59 3 of the laws of 2021 and subdivision 14 as added by chapter 356 of the 4 laws of 1993, are amended and a new subdivision 22 is added to read as 5 follows: 6 (4) "Project" - shall mean any land, any building or other improve- 7 ment, and all real and personal properties located within the state of 8 New York and within or outside or partially within and partially outside 9 the municipality for whose benefit the agency was created, including, 10 but not limited to, machinery, equipment and other facilities deemed 11 necessary or desirable in connection therewith, or incidental thereto, 12 whether or not now in existence or under construction, which shall be 13 suitable for manufacturing, warehousing, research, civic, commercial, 14 renewable energy or industrial purposes or other economically sound 15 purposes identified and called for to implement a state designated urban EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06420-01-5 S. 3368 2 1 cultural park management plan as provided in title G of the parks, 2 recreation and historic preservation law and which may include or mean 3 an industrial pollution control facility, a recreation facility, educa- 4 tional or cultural facility, a horse racing facility, a railroad facili- 5 ty, a renewable energy project, a continuing care retirement community, 6 or a civic facility, provided, however, that, of agencies governed by 7 this article, only agencies created for the benefit of a county and the 8 agency created for the benefit for the city of New York shall provide 9 financial assistance in any respect to a continuing care retirement 10 community, or an automobile racing facility, provided, however, no agen- 11 cy shall use its funds or provide financial assistance in respect of any 12 project wholly or partially outside the municipality for whose benefit 13 the agency was created without the prior consent thereto by the govern- 14 ing body or bodies of all the other municipalities in which a part or 15 parts of the project is, or is to be, located, and such portion of the 16 project located outside such municipality for whose benefit the agency 17 was created shall be contiguous with the portion of the project inside 18 such municipality. Provided further, however, that no agency shall 19 provide financial assistance for any project where the project applicant 20 has any agreement to subsequently contract with a municipality for the 21 lease or purchase of such project or project facility. 22 (14) "Financial assistance" - shall mean the proceeds of bonds issued 23 by an agency, straight-leases, grants, loans, or exemptions from taxa- 24 tion claimed by a project occupant as a result of an agency taking 25 title, possession or control (by lease, license or otherwise) to the 26 property or equipment of such project occupant or of such project occu- 27 pant acting as an agent of an agency. 28 (22) "Civic facility" shall mean a facility to be owned or occupied by 29 a municipal corporation, a district corporation, or a not-for-profit 30 corporation organized and existing under the laws of this state or 31 authorized to conduct activities in this state; provided that such 32 facilities shall be limited to medical facilities including those 33 defined in article twenty-eight of the public health law, educational 34 facilities, recreational facilities for public use, facilities used for 35 municipal government or public safety purposes, or housing facilities 36 primarily designed to be occupied by individuals sixty years of age or 37 older. Nothing in this article shall be deemed to waive any applicable 38 requirement for an operating facility certificate, consent or other 39 approval as provided by law. 40 § 2. Subdivision 2 of section 856 of the general municipal law, as 41 amended by chapter 356 of the laws of 1993, is amended to read as 42 follows: 43 2. An agency shall be a corporate governmental agency, constituting a 44 public benefit corporation. Except as otherwise provided by special act 45 of the legislature, an agency shall consist of not less than [three] 46 five nor more than seven members who shall be appointed by the governing 47 body of each municipality and who shall serve at the pleasure of the 48 appointing authority. Such members may include representatives of local 49 government, school boards, organized labor and business. A member shall 50 continue to hold office until [his] their successor is appointed and has 51 qualified. The governing body of each municipality shall designate the 52 first [chairman] chair and file with the secretary of state a certif- 53 icate of appointment or reappointment of any member. Such members shall 54 receive no compensation for their services but shall be entitled to the 55 necessary expenses, including traveling expenses, incurred in the 56 discharge of their duties. S. 3368 3 1 § 3. Section 858 of the general municipal law, as added by chapter 2 1030 of the laws of 1969, the opening paragraph as amended by section 6 3 of part X of chapter 59 of the laws of 2021, subdivision 4 as amended by 4 chapter 747 of the laws of 2005, subdivision 7 as amended by chapter 559 5 of the laws of 2021, subdivision 8 as amended by chapter 356 of the laws 6 of 1993, subdivision 9 as amended by chapter 444 of the laws of 1997, 7 subdivision 15 as amended by chapter 708 of the laws of 2022, and subdi- 8 visions 16 and 17 as renumbered by chapter 356 of the laws of 1993, is 9 amended to read as follows: 10 § 858. Purposes and powers of the agency. The purposes of the agency 11 shall be to promote, develop, encourage and assist in the acquiring, 12 constructing, reconstructing, improving, maintaining, equipping and 13 furnishing industrial, manufacturing, warehousing, commercial, research, 14 renewable energy and recreation facilities including industrial 15 pollution control facilities, educational or cultural facilities, civic 16 facilities, railroad facilities, horse racing facilities, automobile 17 racing facilities, renewable energy projects and continuing care retire- 18 ment communities, provided, however, that, of agencies governed by this 19 article, only agencies created for the benefit of a county and the agen- 20 cy created for the benefit of the city of New York shall be authorized 21 to provide financial assistance in any respect to a continuing care 22 retirement community, and thereby advance the job opportunities, health, 23 general prosperity and economic welfare of the people of the state of 24 New York and to improve their recreation opportunities, prosperity and 25 standard of living; and to carry out the aforesaid purposes, each agency 26 shall have the following powers: 27 (1) To sue and be sued; 28 (2) To have a seal and alter the same at pleasure; 29 (3) To acquire, hold and dispose of personal property for its corpo- 30 rate purposes; 31 (4) To acquire by purchase, grant, lease, gift, pursuant to the 32 provisions of the eminent domain procedure law, or otherwise and to use, 33 real property or rights or easements therein necessary for its corporate 34 purposes in compliance with the local zoning and planning regulations 35 and shall take into consideration regional and local comprehensive land 36 use plans and state designated heritage area management plans, and to 37 sell, convey, mortgage, lease, pledge, exchange or otherwise dispose of 38 any such property in such manner as the agency shall determine. In the 39 case of railroad facilities, however, the phrase to use real property or 40 rights or easements therein shall not be interpreted to include opera- 41 tion by the agency of rail service upon or in conjunction with such 42 facilities[.]; 43 (5) To acquire real property from a municipality as necessary for its 44 corporate purposes pursuant to section eight hundred fifty-eight-c of 45 this title; 46 (6) To make by-laws for the management and regulation of its affairs 47 and, subject to agreements with its bondholders, for the regulation of 48 the use of a project or projects[.]; 49 [(6)] (7) With the consent of the municipality, to use agents, employ- 50 ees and facilities of the municipality, paying the municipality its 51 agreed proportion of the compensation or costs; 52 [(7)] (8) To appoint officers, agents and employees, to prescribe 53 their qualifications and to fix their compensation and to pay the same 54 out of funds of the agency, provided, however, that an elected officer 55 of the municipality may not serve as a compensated officer, agent or 56 employee of the agency; S. 3368 4 1 [(8)] (9) (a) To appoint an attorney, who may be the counsel of the 2 municipality, and to fix the attorney's compensation for services which 3 shall be payable to the attorney, and to retain and employ private 4 consultants for professional and technical assistance and advice; 5 (b) An attorney acting as bond counsel for a project must file with 6 the agency a written statement in which the attorney identifies each 7 party to the transaction which such attorney represents. If bond counsel 8 provides any legal services to parties other than the agency the written 9 statement must describe the nature of legal services provided by such 10 bond counsel to all parties to the transaction, including the nature of 11 the services provided to the agency[.]; 12 [(9)] (10) To make contracts and leases, and to execute all instru- 13 ments necessary or convenient to or with any person, firm, partnership 14 or corporation, either public or private; provided, however, that any 15 extension of an existing contract, lease or other agreement entered into 16 by an agency with respect to a project shall be guided by the provisions 17 of this article; 18 [(10)] (11) To acquire, construct, reconstruct, lease, improve, main- 19 tain, equip or furnish one or more projects; 20 [(11)] (12) To accept gifts, grants, loans, or contributions from, and 21 enter into contracts or other transactions with, the United States and 22 the state or any agency of either of them, any municipality, any public 23 or private corporation or any other legal entity, and to use any such 24 gifts, grants, loans or contributions for any of its corporate purposes; 25 [(12)] (13) To provide financial assistance in the form of loans to 26 improve, maintain or equip one or more projects consistent with its 27 corporate purposes; 28 (14) To provide financial assistance in the form of grants for one or 29 more projects consistent with its corporate purposes; 30 (15) To borrow money and to issue bonds and to provide for the rights 31 of the holders thereof; 32 [(13)] (16) To grant options to renew any lease with respect to any 33 project or projects and to grant options to buy any project at such 34 price as the agency may deem desirable; 35 [(14)] (17) To designate the depositories of its money either within 36 or without the state; 37 [(15)] (18) To enter into agreements requiring payments in lieu of 38 taxes. Such agreements shall be in writing and in addition to other 39 terms shall contain: the amount due annually to each affected tax juris- 40 diction (or a formula by which the amount due can be calculated), the 41 name and address of the person, office or agency to which payment shall 42 be delivered, the date on which payment shall be made, and the date on 43 which payment shall be considered delinquent if not paid. Unless other- 44 wise agreed by the affected tax jurisdictions, any such agreement shall 45 provide that payments in lieu of taxes shall be allocated among affected 46 tax jurisdictions in proportion to the amount of real property tax and 47 other taxes which would have been received by each affected tax juris- 48 diction had the project not been tax exempt due to the status of the 49 agency involved in the project. A copy of any such agreement shall be 50 delivered to each affected tax jurisdiction within fifteen days of sign- 51 ing the agreement[. In the absence of any such written agreement, 52 payments in lieu of taxes made by an agency shall be allocated in the 53 same proportions as they had been prior to January first, nineteen 54 hundred ninety-three for so long as the agency's activities render a 55 project non-taxable by affected tax jurisdictions] and published by the 56 agency on its website. A notification of the expiration of such agree- S. 3368 5 1 ment shall be delivered to the affected tax jurisdiction two years prior 2 to the expiration of such agreement and immediately upon early termi- 3 nation of an agreement; 4 [(16)] (19) To establish and re-establish its fiscal year; and 5 [(17)] (20) To do all things necessary or convenient to carry out its 6 purposes and exercise the powers expressly given in this title. 7 § 4. The general municipal law is amended by adding a new section 8 858-c to read as follows: 9 § 858-c. Purchase or lease of real property owned by a county, city, 10 town or village. 1. The local legislative body of a county, city, town 11 or village may by resolution determine that specifically described real 12 property owned by the county, city, town or village is not required for 13 use by such county, city, town or village and authorize the county, 14 city, town or village to sell or lease such real property to an agency; 15 provided, however, that title to such land be not declared inalienable 16 as a forest preserve or a parkland. 17 2. Notwithstanding the provisions of any general, special or local 18 law, charter or ordinance to the contrary, such sale or lease may be 19 made without appraisal, public notice (except as provided in subdivision 20 four of this section), or public bidding for such price or rental and 21 upon such terms as may be agreed upon between the county, city, town or 22 village and said agency; provided, however, that in the case of a lease 23 the term may not exceed ninety-nine years and provided, further, that in 24 cities having a population of one million or more, no such sale or lease 25 shall be made without the approval of a majority of the members of the 26 borough board of the borough in which such real property is located. 27 3. Before any sale or lease to an agency shall be authorized, a public 28 hearing shall be held by the local legislative body or borough board to 29 consider the proposed sale or lease. 30 4. Notice of such hearing shall be published at least ten days before 31 the date set for the hearing in such publication and in such manner as 32 may be designated by the local legislative body or borough board. Such 33 notice shall include a description of the real property proposed to be 34 sold or leased; a statement of the estimated fair market value of the 35 real property proposed to be sold or leased; the value of the financial 36 consideration to be received by the county, city, town or village from 37 such sale or lease of the real property; and a statement of the intended 38 use or disposition of such real property by the agency. 39 § 5. Subdivision 3 of section 859 of the general municipal law is 40 REPEALED. 41 § 6. The opening paragraph and subdivisions 1 and 2 of section 859-a 42 of the general municipal law, as added by chapter 356 of the laws of 43 1993, are amended and a new subdivision 3-a is added to read as follows: 44 Prior to providing any financial assistance [of] totaling more than 45 one hundred thousand dollars to any project, the agency must comply with 46 the following prerequisites: 47 1. The agency must adopt a resolution describing the project and the 48 type and amount of financial assistance that the agency is contemplating 49 with respect to such project. Such assistance shall be consistent with 50 the uniform [tax exemption] financial assistance policy adopted by the 51 agency pursuant to subdivision four of section eight hundred seventy- 52 four of this [chapter] title, unless the agency has followed the proce- 53 dures for deviation from such policy specified in paragraph (b) of such 54 subdivision. 55 2. The agency must hold a public hearing with respect to the project 56 and the proposed financial assistance being contemplated by the agency S. 3368 6 1 not less than thirty days prior to executing a written agreement to 2 provide financial assistance. Said public hearing shall be held in [a] 3 each city, town or village where the project to receive financial 4 assistance is located or proposes to locate. At said public hearing, 5 interested parties shall be provided reasonable opportunity, both orally 6 and in writing, to present their views with respect to the project and 7 the type and amount of financial assistance to be provided. The agency 8 shall also accept written comments up to seven days after such hearing 9 is held. 10 3-a. The agency shall maintain a complete record of the hearing, 11 including all documents, oral statements, and written statements 12 presented at or within seven days following the hearing. All members 13 shall be provided with a copy of such record at least seven days before 14 voting whether to approve financial assistance for the project. Such 15 record shall also be posted on the agency website at the time it is 16 provided to members. 17 § 7. The general municipal law is amended by adding four new sections 18 859-c, 859-d, 859-e and 859-f to read as follows: 19 § 859-c. Project application and approval criteria. 1. The project 20 applicant shall submit an application, developed by the agency, for 21 approval of a proposed project and financial assistance. The agency 22 shall adopt project application review and approval criteria that shall 23 be applied to all project applications under consideration for approval 24 and financial assistance. The decision to approve or not approve finan- 25 cial assistance shall be based on, but not limited to, consideration of 26 the following criteria: 27 (a) Strategic objectives. Consideration is to be given to the purpose 28 of the project, such as the nature of the planned business activity, the 29 extent to which the planned business activity is unrepresented or under- 30 represented in the community, and whether the project involves a busi- 31 ness interested in relocating from outside the state of New York. 32 (b) Job creation. A decision to fund a project shall be based on the 33 number of jobs to be created or retained by the proposed project, the 34 range of projected salaries and benefits associated with jobs to be 35 created, and the benchmarks and timeframes to be used by the project to 36 determine whether it is meeting projected job creation and retention 37 goals. 38 (c) The financial viability of the project. Approval for funding must 39 consider the extent to which the viability and success of the project is 40 dependent on financial assistance from the agency. The agency shall also 41 consider the amount and type of financial assistance being requested, 42 the amount and type of private financing required, the amount and type 43 of capital investment to be provided by the project applicant, and any 44 prior financial assistance provided to the project or to the project 45 applicant. 46 (d) Economic benefits. Funding decisions shall consider the potential 47 economic and financial impact of the project on existing businesses in 48 the area, on the affected tax jurisdictions, and on the local labor 49 market. 50 (e) Legal issues. Consideration shall be given to the project appli- 51 cant's record of compliance with applicable laws and regulations. 52 2. The project application review and approval criteria shall be 53 reviewed and approved annually at a regular meeting of the agency and 54 made available to the public on the agency's website. S. 3368 7 1 3. The agency shall provide the director of the authorities budget 2 office with an electronic copy of the application and project review and 3 approval criteria within thirty days of their adoption or revision. 4 4. The agency shall retain a written record of the evaluation of each 5 project application to document its decision to provide or deny finan- 6 cial assistance. 7 § 859-d. Financial assistance agreement. 1. The agency shall enter 8 into a written agreement with the project applicant prior to providing 9 financial assistance. The agreement shall include the following informa- 10 tion: 11 (a) a description of the amount and type of financial assistance to be 12 provided by the agency, including a description and the value of proper- 13 ty conveyed at less than fair market value; 14 (b) a description of the amount of financing to be provided by the 15 project applicant, including the amount and type of capital investment 16 to be provided; 17 (c) the purpose of the project; 18 (d) the amount, types, sources and commitments of any private financ- 19 ing; 20 (e) the projected number of new full-time and part-time positions 21 expected to be created over the period of financial assistance, and an 22 estimated schedule by year of when those positions will be created; 23 (f) the number and types of full-time and part-time jobs to be 24 retained, and the number of filled positions at the project as of the 25 date the agreement is executed; 26 (g) the types and value of other forms of financial assistance 27 provided to the project or requested by the project applicant from other 28 state or local government agencies or authorities; and 29 (h) the penalties to be imposed on the project applicant if the terms 30 of the agreement are not met. 31 2. The length of a financial assistance agreement shall be limited to 32 no more than five years; provided however that the agreement may be 33 renewed for up to five additional years if the agency determines that 34 the project applicant has acted in good faith to meet the terms and 35 conditions of the agreement. In no event may financial assistance in the 36 form of a loan or exemption from taxation be provided to a project for 37 more than ten years. 38 3. The financial assistance agreement shall be made available to the 39 public on the website of the agency. 40 4. The agency shall adopt a methodology to evaluate the conformance of 41 each assisted project to the terms and conditions of the financial 42 assistance agreement. This methodology shall be made available to the 43 public on the agency's website. 44 § 859-e. Recapture of certain financial assistance. 1. The agency, 45 pursuant to the terms and conditions of its financial assistance agree- 46 ment, may recapture financial assistance to a project from real property 47 tax exemptions, mortgage recording tax exemptions, or local sales or 48 compensating use tax exemptions if (a) the project violates state or 49 federal tax law, labor law, environmental protection law, or contract 50 law, or any state or federal rule or regulation implementing such law, 51 as determined by a court of competent jurisdiction or administrative 52 tribunal, provided that such court or tribunal concludes that the 53 violation would cause material harm to the economy or quality of life of 54 the community; or (b) all or part of the project's business activity or 55 workforce is moved to a location outside the community served by the S. 3368 8 1 agency and by doing so violates the terms and conditions of its finan- 2 cial assistance agreement. 3 2. An agency which elects to initiate the recapture of financial 4 assistance pursuant to subdivision one of this section must notify the 5 recipient of such financial assistance in writing that it is in default 6 of its financial assistance agreement and may direct the recipient of 7 financial assistance to repay up to the full amount of such financial 8 assistance received as of the date of the written notice plus interest 9 at the rate set forth in section five thousand four of the civil prac- 10 tice law and rules. 11 3. Financial assistance recaptured pursuant to this section and any 12 interest paid shall be redistributed to affected tax jurisdictions in 13 proportion to the amount of real property tax and other taxes which 14 would have been received by each affected tax jurisdiction had the 15 project not been tax exempt. Unless otherwise agreed to in writing by an 16 affected tax jurisdiction, the agency shall not retain any portion of 17 such funds as an administrative or project fee. 18 § 859-f. Wages and standards. Whenever a recipient of financial 19 assistance from an agency enters into a contract, subcontract, lease or 20 other agreement for or in connection with the construction, demolition, 21 reconstruction, rehabilitation, repair, or renovation of an assisted 22 project, the recipient of financial assistance shall pay workers engaged 23 in such work no less than the prevailing rate of wage and supplements 24 under article eight of the labor law. 25 § 8. Subdivision 1 of section 862 of the general municipal law, as 26 amended by section 1 of part J of chapter 59 of the laws of 2013, is 27 amended to read as follows: 28 (1) (a) No [funds] financial assistance of the agency shall be used in 29 respect [of] to any project if the [completion thereof would result in] 30 project approval or provision of financial assistance contributes to the 31 removal of [an industrial or manufacturing plant of] all or part of the 32 project occupant from one area of the state to another area of the state 33 or in the abandonment of one or more [plants or] facilities of the 34 project occupant located within the state, or provides the project with 35 a competitive advantage over existing like businesses in the same indus- 36 try located in the same city, town, or village as such project, 37 provided, however, that [neither restriction] such restrictions shall 38 not apply if the agency shall determine on the basis of the application 39 before it that the project is reasonably necessary to discourage the 40 project occupant from removing such other plant or facility to a 41 location outside the state or is reasonably necessary to preserve the 42 competitive position of the project occupant in its respective industry. 43 (b) For the purposes of this subdivision, "competitive advantage" 44 shall include trade secrets that are submitted to an agency by a commer- 45 cial enterprise or derived from information obtained from a commercial 46 enterprise and which if disclosed would cause substantial injury to the 47 competitive position of the subject enterprise. Other factors to be 48 considered in determining whether a trade secret exists include: 49 (i) the extent to which the information is known outside the business; 50 (ii) the extent to which the information is known by a business' 51 employees and others involved in the business; 52 (iii) the extent of measures taken by a business to guard the secrecy 53 of the information; 54 (iv) the value of the information to a business and to its compet- 55 itors; S. 3368 9 1 (v) the amount of effort or money expended by a business in developing 2 the information; and 3 (vi) the ease or difficulty with which the information could be prop- 4 erly acquired or duplicated by others. If there has been a voluntary 5 disclosure by the plaintiff, or if the facts pertaining to the matter 6 are a subject of general knowledge in the trade, then any property right 7 has evaporated. 8 § 9. Subdivision 4 of section 874 of the general municipal law, as 9 amended by chapter 357 of the laws of 1993, paragraph (a) as amended by 10 chapter 646 of the laws of 2024, and paragraph (b) as amended by chapter 11 32 of the laws of 2023, is amended to read as follows: 12 (4) (a) The agency shall [establish] adopt a uniform [tax exemption] 13 financial assistance policy, [with input from] subject to the approval 14 of all affected tax jurisdictions, which shall be applicable to the 15 provision of financial assistance pursuant to section eight hundred 16 fifty-nine-a of this title and shall provide guidelines for the claiming 17 of real property, mortgage recording, and sales tax exemptions. Such 18 guidelines shall include, but not be limited to: period of exemption; 19 payments in lieu of taxed, as a percentage of [exemption] taxes that 20 would have been levied by or on behalf of affected tax jurisdictions if 21 the project was not tax exempt by reason of agency involvement; types of 22 projects for which exemptions can be claimed; procedures for payments in 23 lieu of taxes and instances in which real property appraisals are to be 24 performed as a part of an application for tax exemption; in addition, 25 agencies shall in adopting such policy consider such issues as: the 26 extent to which a project will create or retain permanent, private 27 sector jobs; the estimated value of any tax exemptions to be provided; 28 whether affected tax jurisdictions shall be reimbursed by the project 29 occupant if a project does not fulfill the purposes for which an 30 exemption was provided; the impact of a proposed project on existing and 31 proposed businesses and economic development projects in the vicinity; 32 the amount of private sector investment generated or likely to be gener- 33 ated by the proposed project; the demonstrated public support for the 34 proposed project; the likelihood of accomplishing the proposed project 35 in a timely fashion; the effect of the proposed project upon the envi- 36 ronment; the extent to which the project will utilize, to the fullest 37 extent practicable and economically feasible, resource conservation, 38 energy efficiency, green technologies, and alternative and renewable 39 energy measures; the extent to which the project will provide onsite 40 child daycare facilities; the extent to which the proposed project will 41 require the provision of additional services, including, but not limited 42 to additional educational, transportation, police, emergency medical or 43 fire services; and the extent to which the proposed project will provide 44 additional sources of revenue for municipalities and school districts. 45 The adopted uniform financial assistance policy shall be provided to the 46 chief executive officer and the members of the governing body of each 47 affected tax jurisdiction and shall be made available for public 48 inspection at the agency's office and on the agency's website upon its 49 adoption. 50 (b) The agency shall [establish a procedure] adopt criteria for devi- 51 ation from the uniform [tax exemption] financial assistance policy 52 required pursuant to this subdivision, which shall be subject to the 53 approval of all affected local tax jurisdictions. The agency shall set 54 forth in writing the reasons for deviation from such policy, and shall 55 further notify by certified mail, return receipt requested or an elec- 56 tronic correspondence with a read-receipt, the affected local taxing S. 3368 10 1 jurisdictions of the proposed deviation from such policy and the reasons 2 therefor not less than sixty days before such deviation from the uniform 3 financial assistance policy takes effect. When the affected local taxing 4 jurisdiction is a school district, the agency shall notify by certified 5 mail, return receipt requested or an electronic correspondence with a 6 read-receipt, the district clerk and district superintendent of each 7 affected school district. 8 § 10. Section 1953 of the public authorities law, as added by chapter 9 759 of the laws of 1967, the opening paragraph, the second undesignated 10 paragraph, and subdivisions 4 and 7 as amended by chapter 579 of the 11 laws of 2021, subdivision 8 as amended, and subdivisions 15 and 16 as 12 renumbered by chapter 356 of the laws of 1993, subdivisions 9 and 13 as 13 amended by chapter 907 of the laws of 1972, and subdivision 14 as 14 amended by chapter 708 of the laws of 2022, is amended to read as 15 follows: 16 § 1953. Purpose and powers of the authority. The purposes of the 17 authority shall be to promote, develop, encourage and assist in the 18 acquiring, constructing, reconstructing, improving, maintaining, equip- 19 ping and furnishing industrial, manufacturing, warehouse, civic facili- 20 ties, commercial and research facilities including industrial pollution 21 control facilities, transportation facilities including but not limited 22 to those relating to water, highway, rail and air, in one or more areas 23 of the city, particularly but not exclusively at the site of what was 24 formerly the Troy airport including an airstrip or airport located in 25 the southern section of the city and thereby advance the job opportu- 26 nities, health, general prosperity and economic welfare of the people of 27 said city and to improve their standard of living; provided, however, 28 that the authority shall not undertake any project if the completion 29 thereof would result in the removal of an industrial or manufacturing 30 plant of the project occupant from one area of the state to another area 31 of the state or in the abandonment of one or more plants or facilities 32 of the project applicant located within the state, provided, however, 33 that neither restriction shall apply if the authority shall determine on 34 the basis of the application before it that the project is reasonably 35 necessary to discourage the project occupant from removing such other 36 plant or facility to a location outside the state or is reasonably 37 necessary to preserve the competitive position of the project occupant 38 in its respective industry. Except as otherwise provided for in this 39 section, no financial assistance of the authority shall be provided in 40 respect of any project where facilities or property that are primarily 41 used in making retail sales to customers who personally visit such 42 facilities constitute more than one-third of the total project cost. For 43 the purposes of this article, "retail sales" shall mean: (i) sales by a 44 registered vendor under article twenty-eight of the tax law primarily 45 engaged in the retail sale of tangible personal property, as defined in 46 subparagraph (i) of paragraph four of subdivision (b) of section eleven 47 hundred one of the tax law; or (ii) sales of a service to such custom- 48 ers. Except, however, that tourism destination projects shall not be 49 prohibited by this paragraph. For the purpose of this paragraph, "tour- 50 ism destination" shall mean a location or facility which is likely to 51 attract a significant number of visitors from outside the economic 52 development region as established by section two hundred thirty of the 53 economic development law in which the project is located. 54 Notwithstanding the provisions of this section to the contrary, such 55 financial assistance may, however, be provided to a project where facil- 56 ities or property that are primarily used in making retail sales of S. 3368 11 1 goods or services to customers who personally visit such facilities to 2 obtain such goods or services constitute more than one-third of the 3 total project cost, where: (i) the predominant purpose of the project 4 would be to make available goods or services which would not, but for 5 the project, be reasonably accessible to the residents of the city of 6 Troy because of a lack of reasonably accessible retail trade facilities 7 offering such goods or services; or (ii) the project is located in a 8 highly distressed area. With respect to projects authorized pursuant to 9 this paragraph no project shall be approved unless the authority shall 10 find after the public hearing required by section twenty-three hundred 11 seven of this chapter that undertaking the project will serve the public 12 purposes of this article by preserving permanent, private sector jobs or 13 increasing the overall number of permanent, private sector jobs in the 14 state. Where the authority makes such a finding, prior to providing 15 financial assistance to the project by the authority, the chief execu- 16 tive officer of the city of Troy shall confirm the proposed action of 17 the authority. To carry out said purposes, the authority shall have 18 power: 19 1. To sue and be sued; 20 2. To have a seal and alter the same at pleasure; 21 3. To acquire, hold and dispose of personal property for its corporate 22 purpose; 23 4. To acquire by purchase, grant, lease, gift, condemnation, or other- 24 wise and to use, real property or rights or easements therein necessary 25 for its corporate purposes, and to sell, convey, mortgage, lease, 26 pledge, exchange or otherwise dispose of any such property in such 27 manner as the authority shall determine. With respect to real property 28 conveyed to it by the city, however, such power of disposition shall be 29 limited as hereinafter provided in section nineteen hundred fifty-five 30 of this title; 31 5. To acquire real property within the city of Troy as necessary for 32 its corporate purposes pursuant to section eight hundred fifty-eight-c 33 of the general municipal law; 34 6. To make by-laws for the management and regulation of its affairs 35 and, subject to agreements with its bondholders, for the regulation of 36 the use of the project; 37 [6.] 7. With the consent of the city, to use agents, employees and 38 facilities of the city, paying the city its agreed proportion of the 39 compensation or costs; 40 [7.] 8. To appoint officers, agents and employees, to prescribe their 41 qualifications and to fix their compensation and to pay the same out of 42 funds of the authority, subject, however, to the provisions of the civil 43 service law as hereinafter provided in section nineteen hundred fifty- 44 four of this title; 45 [8.] 9. To appoint an attorney, who may be the corporation counsel of 46 the city, and to fix the attorney's compensation for services which 47 shall be payable to the attorney, and to retain and employ private 48 consultants for professional and technical assistance and advice; 49 provided that an attorney acting as bond counsel for a project must file 50 with the authority a written statement in which the attorney identifies 51 each party to the transaction which such attorney represents. If bond 52 counsel provides any legal services to parties other than the authority, 53 the written statement must describe the nature of legal services 54 provided by such bond counsel to all parties to the transaction, includ- 55 ing the nature of the services provided to the authority; S. 3368 12 1 [9.] 10. To make contracts and leases upon such terms as the authority 2 shall deem appropriate, including without limitation leases which grant 3 the tenant of a project an option to renew or an option to purchase the 4 project, or both, at a fixed or otherwise predetermined price and to 5 execute all instruments necessary or convenient; 6 [10.] 11. To acquire, construct, reconstruct, lease, improve, main- 7 tain, equip or furnish one or more projects; 8 [11.] 12. To accept gifts, grants, loans or contributions from, and 9 enter into contracts or other transactions with, the United States and 10 the state or any agency of either of them, any municipality, any public 11 or private corporation or any other legal entity, and to use any such 12 gifts, grants, loans or contributions for any of its corporate purposes; 13 [12.] 13. To provide financial assistance in the form of loans to 14 improve, maintain or equip one or more projects consistent with its 15 corporate purposes; 16 14. To provide financial assistance in the form of grants to one or 17 more projects consistent with its corporate purposes; 18 15. To borrow money and to issue bonds and to provide for the rights 19 of the holders thereof; 20 [13.] 16. To designate the depositories of its money either within or 21 without the state of New York; 22 [14.] 17. To enter into agreements requiring payments in lieu of 23 taxes. Such agreements shall be in writing and in addition to other 24 terms shall contain: the amount due annually to each affected tax juris- 25 diction (or a formula by which the amount due can be calculated), the 26 name and address of the person, office or agency to which payment shall 27 be delivered, the date on which payment shall be made, and the date on 28 which payment shall be considered delinquent if not paid. Unless other- 29 wise agreed by the affected tax jurisdictions, any such agreement shall 30 provide that payments in lieu of taxes shall be allocated among affected 31 tax jurisdictions in proportion to the amount of real property tax and 32 other taxes which would have been received by each affected tax juris- 33 diction had the project not been tax exempt due to the status of the 34 authority involved in the project. A copy of any such agreement shall be 35 delivered to each affected tax jurisdiction within fifteen days of sign- 36 ing the agreement. In the absence of any such written agreement, 37 payments in lieu of taxes made by an agency shall be allocated in the 38 same proportions as they had been prior to January first, nineteen 39 hundred ninety-three for so long as the authority's activities render a 40 project non-taxable by affected tax jurisdictions. A notification of the 41 expiration of such agreement shall be delivered to the affected tax 42 jurisdiction two years prior to the expiration of such agreement and 43 immediately upon early termination of an agreement; 44 [15.] 18. To establish and reestablish its fiscal year; and 45 [16.] 19. To do all things necessary or convenient to carry out its 46 purposes and exercise the powers expressly given in this title. 47 § 11. Section 1953-a of the public authorities law, as added by chap- 48 ter 356 of the laws of 1993, subdivision 1 as amended by chapter 357 of 49 the laws of 1993, and subdivision 1-a as amended and subdivision 4 as 50 added by chapter 32 of the laws of 2023, is amended to read as follows: 51 § 1953-a. Additional prerequisites to the provision of financial 52 assistance. Prior to providing any financial assistance [of] totaling 53 more than one hundred thousand dollars to any project, the authority 54 must comply with the following prerequisites: 55 1. The authority must adopt a resolution describing the project and 56 type and amount of the financial assistance that the authority is S. 3368 13 1 contemplating with respect to such project. Such assistance shall be 2 consistent with the uniform [tax exemption] financial assistance policy 3 adopted by the agency pursuant to subdivision one of section nineteen 4 hundred sixty-three-a of this [chapter] title, unless the agency has 5 followed procedures for deviation from such policy specified in subdivi- 6 sion two of such section. 7 1-a. The authority shall deliver a copy of the resolution adopted 8 pursuant to subdivision one of this section by certified mail, return 9 receipt requested or an electronic correspondence with a read receipt, 10 to the chief executive officer of each affected tax jurisdiction. When 11 the affected tax jurisdiction is a school district, the authority shall 12 deliver a copy of such resolution by certified mail, return receipt 13 requested or an electronic correspondence with a read-receipt, to the 14 district clerk and district superintendent of each affected school 15 district. 16 2. The authority must hold a public hearing with respect to the 17 project and the proposed financial assistance being contemplated by the 18 authority not less than thirty days prior to executing a written agree- 19 ment to provide financial assistance. At said public hearing, inter- 20 ested parties shall be provided reasonable opportunity, both orally and 21 in writing, to present their views with respect to the project and the 22 type and amount of financial assistance to be provided. The authority 23 shall also accept written comments up to seven days after such hearing 24 is held. 25 3. The authority must give at least ten days published notice of said 26 public hearing and shall, at the same time, provide notice of such hear- 27 ing to the chief executive officer of the affected tax jurisdiction 28 within which the project is located. The notice of hearing must state 29 the time and place of the hearing, contain a general, functional 30 description of the project, describe the prospective location of the 31 project, identify the initial owner, operator or manager of the project 32 and generally describe the financial assistance contemplated by the 33 authority with respect to the project. 34 4. The authority shall establish a procedure for compliance with the 35 notification requirements, including identification of the notification 36 method, under subdivision one-a of this section and subdivision two of 37 section nineteen hundred sixty-three-a of this title. 38 5. The authority shall maintain a complete record of the hearing, 39 including all documents and oral statements, and written statements 40 presented at or within seven days following such hearing. All members 41 shall be provided with a copy of such record at least seven days before 42 voting whether to approve financial assistance for the project. Such 43 record shall also be posted on the authority website at the time it is 44 provided to members. 45 § 12. The public authorities law is amended by adding four new 46 sections 1953-b, 1953-c, 1953-d and 1953-e to read as follows: 47 § 1953-b. Project application and approval criteria. 1. The project 48 applicant shall submit an application, developed by the authority, for 49 approval of a proposed project and financial assistance. The authority 50 shall adopt project application review and approval criteria that shall 51 be applied to all project applications under consideration for approval 52 and financial assistance. The decision to approve or not approve finan- 53 cial assistance shall be based on, but not limited to, consideration of 54 the following criteria: 55 (a) Strategic objectives. Consideration is to be given to the purpose 56 of the project, such as the nature of the planned business activity, the S. 3368 14 1 extent to which the planned business activity is unrepresented or under- 2 represented in the community, and whether the project involves a busi- 3 ness interested in relocating from outside the state of New York. 4 (b) Job creation. A decision to fund a project shall be based on the 5 number of jobs to be created or retained by the proposed project, the 6 range of projected salaries and benefits associated with jobs to be 7 created, and the benchmarks and timeframes to be used by the project to 8 determine whether it is meeting projected job creation and retention 9 goals. 10 (c) The financial viability of the project. Approval for funding shall 11 consider the extent to which the viability and success of the project is 12 dependent on financial assistance from the authority. The authority 13 shall also consider the amount and type of financial assistance being 14 requested, the amount and type of private financing required, the amount 15 and type of capital investment to be provided by the project applicant, 16 and any prior financial assistance provided to the project or to the 17 project applicant. 18 (d) Economic benefits. Funding decisions shall consider the potential 19 economic and financial impact of the project on existing businesses in 20 the area, on the affected tax jurisdictions, and on the local labor 21 market. 22 (e) Legal issues. Consideration shall be given to the project appli- 23 cant's record of compliance with applicable laws and regulations. 24 2. The project application review and approval criteria shall be 25 reviewed and approved annually at a regular meeting of the authority and 26 made available to the public on the authority's website. 27 3. The authority shall provide the director of the authorities budget 28 office with an electronic copy of the application and project review and 29 approval criteria within thirty days of their adoption or revision. 30 4. The authority shall retain a written record of the evaluation of 31 each project application to document its decision to provide or deny 32 financial assistance. 33 § 1953-c. Financial assistance agreement. 1. The authority shall enter 34 into a written agreement with the project applicant prior to providing 35 financial assistance. The agreement shall include the following informa- 36 tion: 37 (a) a description of the amount and type of financial assistance to be 38 provided by the authority, including a description and the value of 39 property conveyed at less than fair market value; 40 (b) a description of the amount of financing to be provided by the 41 project applicant, including the amount and type of capital investment 42 to be provided; 43 (c) the purpose of the project; 44 (d) the amount, types, sources and commitments of any private financ- 45 ing; 46 (e) the projected number of new full-time and part-time positions 47 expected to be created over the period of financial assistance, and an 48 estimated schedule by year of when those positions will be created; 49 (f) the number and types of full-time and part-time jobs to be 50 retained, and the number of filled positions at the project as of the 51 date the agreement is executed; 52 (g) the types and value of other forms of financial assistance 53 provided to the project or requested by the project applicant from other 54 state or local government agencies or authorities; and 55 (h) the penalties to be imposed on the project applicant if the terms 56 of the agreement are not met. S. 3368 15 1 2. The length of a financial assistance agreement shall be limited to 2 no more than five years; provided however that the agreement may be 3 renewed for up to five additional years if the authority determines that 4 the project applicant has acted in good faith to meet the terms and 5 conditions of the agreement. In no event may financial assistance in the 6 form of a loan or exemption from taxation be provided to a project for 7 more than ten years. 8 3. The financial assistance agreement shall be made available to the 9 public on the website of the authority. 10 4. The authority shall adopt a methodology to evaluate the conformance 11 of each assisted project to the terms and conditions of the financial 12 assistance agreement. This methodology shall be made available to the 13 public on the authority's website. 14 § 1953-d. Recapture of certain financial assistance. 1. The authority, 15 pursuant to the terms and conditions of its financial assistance agree- 16 ment, may recapture financial assistance to a project from the proceeds 17 of bonds issued by the authority, mortgage recording tax exemptions, or 18 local sales or compensating use tax exemptions if (a) the project 19 violates state or federal tax law, labor law, environmental protection 20 law, or contract law, or any state or federal rule or regulation imple- 21 menting such law, as determined by a court of competent jurisdiction or 22 administrative tribunal, provided that such court or tribunal concludes 23 that the violation would cause material harm to the economy or quality 24 of life of the community; or (b) all or part of the project's business 25 activity or workforce is moved to a location outside the community 26 served by the authority and by doing so violates the terms and condi- 27 tions of its financial assistance agreement. 28 2. An authority which elects to initiate the recapture of financial 29 assistance pursuant to subdivision one of section eight hundred fifty- 30 nine-e of the general municipal law must notify the recipient of such 31 financial assistance in writing that it is in default of its financial 32 assistance agreement and may direct the recipient of financial assist- 33 ance to repay up to the full amount of such financial assistance 34 received as of the date of the written notice plus interest at the rate 35 set forth in section five thousand four of the civil practice law and 36 rules. 37 3. Financial assistance recaptured pursuant to this section and any 38 interest paid shall be redistributed to affected tax jurisdictions in 39 proportion to the amount of real property tax and other taxes which 40 would have been received by each affected tax jurisdiction had the 41 project not been tax exempt. Unless otherwise agreed to in writing by an 42 affected tax jurisdiction, the authority shall not retain any portion of 43 such funds as an administrative or project fee. 44 § 1953-e. Wages and standards. Whenever a recipient of financial 45 assistance from the authority enters into a contract, subcontract, lease 46 or other agreement for or in connection with the construction, demoli- 47 tion, reconstruction, rehabilitation, repair, or renovation of an 48 assisted project, the recipient of financial assistance shall pay work- 49 ers engaged in such work no less than the prevailing rate of wage and 50 supplements under article eight of the labor law. 51 § 13. Section 1963-a of the public authorities law, as amended by 52 chapter 357 of the laws of 1993, subdivision 1 as amended by chapter 646 53 of the laws of 2024, and subdivision 2 as amended by chapter 32 of the 54 laws of 2023, is amended to read as follows: 55 § 1963-a. Uniform [tax exemption] financial assistance policy. 1. The 56 authority shall [establish] adopt a uniform [tax exemption] financial S. 3368 16 1 assistance policy, [with input from] subject to the approval of affected 2 local taxing jurisdictions, which shall be applicable to provisions of 3 financial assistance pursuant to section nineteen hundred fifty-three-a 4 of this title and shall provide guidelines for the claiming of real 5 property, mortgage recording, and sales tax exemptions. Such guidelines 6 shall include, but not be limited to: period of exemption; payments in 7 lieu of taxes as a percentage of [exemption] taxes that would have been 8 levied by or on behalf of affected tax jurisdictions if the project was 9 not exempt by reason of authority involvement; types of projects for 10 which exemptions can be claimed; procedures for payments in lieu of 11 taxes and instances in which real property appraisals are to be 12 performed as a part of an application for tax exemption; in addition, 13 the authority in adopting such policy shall consider such issues as: the 14 extent to which a project will create or retain permanent, private 15 sector jobs; the estimated value of any tax exemption to be provided; 16 whether affected tax jurisdictions should be reimbursed by the project 17 occupant if a project does not fulfill the purposes for which an 18 exemption was provided; the impact of a proposed project on existing and 19 proposed businesses and economic development projects in the vicinity; 20 the amount of private sector investment generated or likely to be gener- 21 ated by the proposed project; the demonstrated public support for the 22 proposed project; the likelihood of accomplishing the proposed project 23 in a timely fashion; the effect of the proposed project upon the envi- 24 ronment; the extent to which the project will utilize, to the fullest 25 extent practicable and economically feasible, resource conservation, 26 energy efficiency, green technologies, and alternative and renewable 27 energy measures; the extent to which the project will provide onsite 28 child daycare facilities; the extent to which the proposed project will 29 require the provision of additional services, including, but not limited 30 to additional educational, transportation, police, emergency medical or 31 fire services; and the extent to which the proposed project will provide 32 additional sources [or] of revenue for municipalities and school 33 districts. The adopted uniform financial assistance policy shall be 34 provided to the chief executive officer and members of the governing 35 body of each affected tax jurisdiction and shall be made available for 36 public inspection at the authority's office and on the authority's 37 website upon its adoption. 38 2. The authority shall [establish a procedure] adopt criteria for 39 deviation from the uniform [tax exemption] financial assistance policy 40 required pursuant to this section. The authority shall set forth in 41 writing the reasons for deviation from such policy, and shall further 42 notify by certified mail, return receipt requested or an electronic 43 correspondence with a read-receipt, the affected tax jurisdictions of 44 the proposed deviation from such policy and the reasons therefor not 45 less than sixty days before such deviation from the uniform financial 46 assistance policy takes effect. When the affected tax jurisdiction is a 47 school district, the authority shall notify by certified mail, return 48 receipt requested or an electronic correspondence with a read-receipt, 49 the district clerk and district superintendent of each affected school 50 district. 51 § 14. Section 2306 of the public authorities law, as added by chapter 52 915 of the laws of 1969, the opening paragraph and the first undesig- 53 nated paragraph as amended by chapter 304 of the laws of 2013, subdivi- 54 sion 8 as amended and subdivisions 15 and 16 as renumbered by chapter 55 356 of the laws of 1993, subdivision 9 as amended by chapter 556 of the S. 3368 17 1 laws of 1973, and subdivision 14 as amended by chapter 708 of the laws 2 of 2022, is amended to read as follows: 3 § 2306. Purpose and powers of the authority. The purposes of the 4 authority shall be to promote, develop, encourage and assist in the 5 acquiring, constructing, reconstructing, improving, maintaining, equip- 6 ping and furnishing industrial, manufacturing, warehouse, civic facili- 7 ties, commercial and research facilities and facilities for use by a 8 federal agency or a medical facility including industrial pollution 9 control facilities, which may include transportation facilities includ- 10 ing but not limited to those relating to water, highway, rail and air, 11 in one or more areas of the city, and thereby advance the job opportu- 12 nities, health, general prosperity and economic welfare of the people of 13 said city and to improve their medical care and standard of living; 14 provided, however, that the authority shall not undertake any project if 15 the completion thereof would result in the removal of an industrial or 16 manufacturing plant of the project occupant from one area of the state 17 to another area of the state or in abandonment of one or more plants or 18 facilities of the project applicant located within the state, provided, 19 however, that neither restriction shall apply if the authority shall 20 determine on the basis of the application before it that the project is 21 reasonably necessary to discourage the project occupant from removing 22 such other plant or facility to a location outside the state or is 23 reasonably necessary to preserve the competitive position of the project 24 occupant in its respective industry. Except as otherwise provided for in 25 this section, no financial assistance of the authority shall be provided 26 in respect of any project where facilities or property that are primari- 27 ly used in making retail sales to customers who personally visit such 28 facilities constitute more than one-third of the total project cost. For 29 the purposes of this article, "retail sales" shall mean: (i) sales by a 30 registered vendor under article twenty-eight of the tax law primarily 31 engaged in the retail sale of tangible personal property, as defined in 32 subparagraph (i) of paragraph four of subdivision (b) of section eleven 33 hundred one of the tax law; or (ii) sales of a service to such custom- 34 ers. Except, however, that tourism destination projects shall not be 35 prohibited by this paragraph. For the purpose of this paragraph, "tour- 36 ism destination" shall mean a location or facility which is likely to 37 attract a significant number of visitors from outside the economic 38 development region as established by section two hundred thirty of the 39 economic development law, in which the project is located. 40 Notwithstanding the provisions of this section to the contrary, such 41 financial assistance may, however, be provided to a project where facil- 42 ities or property that are primarily used in making retail sales of 43 goods or services to customers who personally visit such facilities to 44 obtain such goods or services constitute more than one-third of the 45 total project cost, where: (i) the predominant purpose of the project 46 would be to make available goods or services which would not, but for 47 the project, be reasonably accessible to the residents of the city of 48 Auburn because of a lack of reasonably accessible retail trade facili- 49 ties offering such goods or services; or (ii) the project is located in 50 a highly distressed area. With respect to projects authorized pursuant 51 to this paragraph no project shall be approved unless the authority 52 shall find after the public hearing required by section twenty-three 53 hundred seven of this title that undertaking the project will serve the 54 public purposes of this article by preserving permanent, private sector 55 jobs or increasing the overall number of permanent, private sector jobs 56 in the state. Where the authority makes such a finding, prior to provid- S. 3368 18 1 ing financial assistance to the project by the authority, the chief 2 executive officer of the city of Auburn shall confirm the proposed 3 action of the authority. To carry out said purpose, the authority shall 4 have power: 5 1. To sue and be sued; 6 2. To have a seal and alter the same at pleasure; 7 3. To acquire, hold and dispose of personal property for its corporate 8 purpose; 9 4. To acquire by purchase, grant, lease, gift, condemnation, or other- 10 wise and to use, real property or rights or easements therein necessary 11 for its corporate purposes, and to sell, convey, mortgage, lease, 12 pledge, exchange or otherwise dispose of any such property in such 13 manner as the authority shall determine. With respect to real property 14 conveyed to it by the city, however, such power of disposition shall be 15 limited as hereinafter provided in section twenty-three hundred ten of 16 this title; 17 5. To acquire real property within the city of Auburn as necessary for 18 its corporate purposes pursuant to section eight hundred fifty-eight-c 19 of the general municipal law; 20 6. To make by-laws for the management and regulation of its affairs 21 and, subject to agreements with its bondholders, for the regulation of 22 the use of the project[.]; 23 [6.] 7. With the consent of the city, to use agents, employees and 24 facilities of the city, paying the city its agreed proportion of the 25 compensation or costs[.]; 26 [7.] 8. To appoint officers, agents and employees, to prescribe their 27 qualifications and to fix their compensation and to pay the same out of 28 funds of the authority, subject, however, to the provisions of the civil 29 service law hereinafter provided in section twenty-three hundred eight 30 of this title; 31 [8.] 9. To retain and employ financial advisors, engineers, archi- 32 tects, attorneys and other consultants for professional and technical 33 assistance and advice; that an attorney acting as bond counsel for a 34 project must file with the authority a written statement in which the 35 attorney identifies each party to the transaction which such attorney 36 represents. If bond counsel provides any legal services to the parties 37 other than the authority, the written statement must describe the nature 38 of legal services provided by such bond counsel to all parties to the 39 transaction, including the nature of the services provided to the 40 authority; 41 [9.] 10. To make contracts and leases upon such terms as the authority 42 shall deem appropriate, including without limitation leases which grant 43 the tenant of a project an option to renew or an option to purchase the 44 project, or both, at a fixed or otherwise predetermined price, and to 45 execute all instruments necessary or convenient; 46 [10.] 11. To acquire, construct, reconstruct, lease, improve, main- 47 tain, equip or furnish one or more projects; 48 [11.] 12. To accept gifts, grants, loans or contributions from, and 49 enter into contracts or other transactions with, the United States and 50 the state or any agency of either of them, any municipality, any public 51 or private corporation or any other legal entity, and to use any such 52 gifts, grants, loans or contributions for any of its corporate purposes; 53 [12.] 13. To provide financial assistance in the form of loans to 54 improve, maintain or equip one or more projects consistent with its 55 corporate purposes; S. 3368 19 1 14. To provide financial assistance in the form of grants for one or 2 more projects consistent with its corporate purposes; 3 15. To borrow money and to issue bonds and to provide for the rights 4 of the holders thereof; 5 [13.] 16. To designate the depositories of its money in the city of 6 Auburn[.]; 7 [14.] 17. To enter into agreements requiring payments in lieu of 8 taxes. Such agreements shall be in writing and in addition to other 9 terms shall contain: the amount due annually to each affected tax juris- 10 diction (or a formula by which the amount due can be calculated), the 11 name and address of the person, office or agency to which payment shall 12 be delivered, the date on which the payment shall be made, and the date 13 on which payment shall be considered delinquent if not paid. Unless 14 otherwise agreed by the affected tax jurisdictions, any such agreement 15 shall provide that payments in lieu of taxes shall be allocated among 16 affected tax jurisdictions in proportion to the amount of real property 17 tax and other taxes which would have been received by each affected tax 18 jurisdiction had the project not been tax exempt due to the status of 19 the agency involved in the project. A copy of any such agreement shall 20 be delivered to each tax affected jurisdiction within fifteen days of 21 signing the agreement. In the absence of any such written agreement, 22 payments in lieu of taxes shall be allocated in the same proportions as 23 they had been prior to January first, nineteen hundred ninety-three for 24 so long as the authority's activities render a project non-taxable by 25 affected tax jurisdictions. A notification of the expiration of such 26 agreement shall be delivered to the affected tax jurisdiction two years 27 prior to the expiration of such agreement and immediately upon early 28 termination of an agreement; 29 [15.] 18. To establish and reestablish its fiscal year; and 30 [16.] 19. To do all things necessary or convenient to carry out its 31 purposes and exercise the powers expressly given in this title. 32 § 15. Section 2307 of the public authorities law, as added by chapter 33 356 of the laws of 1993, subdivision 1 as amended by chapter 357 of the 34 laws of 1993, and subdivision 1-a as amended and subdivision 4 as added 35 by chapter 32 of the laws of 2023, is amended to read as follows: 36 § 2307. Additional prerequisites to the provision of financial assist- 37 ance. Prior to providing any financial assistance [of] totaling more 38 than one hundred thousand dollars to any project, the authority must 39 comply with the following prerequisites: 40 1. The authority must adopt a resolution describing the project and 41 type and amount of the financial assistance that the authority is 42 contemplating with respect to such project. Such assistance shall be 43 consistent with the uniform [tax exemption] financial assistance policy 44 adopted by the agency pursuant to subdivision one of section twenty- 45 three hundred fifteen of this chapter, unless the agency has followed 46 procedures for deviation from such policy specified in subdivision two 47 of such section. 48 1-a. The authority shall deliver a copy of the resolution adopted 49 pursuant to subdivision one of this section by certified mail, return 50 receipt requested or an electronic correspondence with a read-receipt, 51 to the chief executive officer of each affected tax jurisdiction. When 52 the affected tax jurisdiction is a school district, the authority shall 53 deliver a copy of such resolution by certified mail, return receipt 54 requested or an electronic correspondence with a read-receipt, to the 55 district clerk and district superintendent of each affected school 56 district. S. 3368 20 1 2. The authority must hold a public hearing with respect to the 2 project and the proposed financial assistance being contemplated by the 3 authority not less than thirty days prior to executing a written agree- 4 ment to provide financial assistance. At said public hearing, inter- 5 ested parties shall be provided reasonable opportunity, both orally and 6 in writing, to present their views with respect to the project and the 7 type and amount of financial assistance to be provided. The authority 8 shall also accept written comments up to seven days after such hearing 9 is held. 10 3. The authority must give at least ten days published notice of said 11 public hearing and shall, at the same time, provide notice of such hear- 12 ing to the chief executive officer of each affected tax [jurisidiction] 13 jurisdiction within which the project is located. The notice of hearing 14 must state the time and place of the hearing, contain a general, func- 15 tional description of the project, describe the prospective location of 16 the project, identify the initial owner, operator or manager of the 17 project and generally describe the financial assistance contemplated by 18 the authority with respect to the project. 19 4. The authority shall establish a procedure for compliance with the 20 notification requirements, including identification of the notification 21 method, of subdivision one-a of this section and subdivision two of 22 section twenty-three hundred fifteen of this title. 23 5. The authority shall maintain a complete record of the hearing, 24 including all documents and oral statements, and written statements 25 presented at or within seven days following such hearing. All members 26 shall be provided with a copy of such record at least seven days before 27 deciding whether to approve financial assistance for the project. Such 28 record shall also be posted on the authority's website at the time it is 29 provided to members. 30 § 16. The public authorities law is amended by adding four new 31 sections 2307-a, 2307-b, 2307-c and 2307-d to read as follows: 32 § 2307-a. Project application and approval criteria. 1. The project 33 applicant shall submit an application, developed by the authority, for 34 approval of a proposed project and financial assistance. The authority 35 shall adopt project application review and approval criteria that shall 36 be applied to all project applications under consideration for approval 37 and financial assistance. The decision to approve or not approve finan- 38 cial assistance shall be based on, but not limited to, consideration of 39 the following criteria: 40 (a) Strategic objectives. Consideration is to be given to the purpose 41 of the project, such as the nature of the planned business activity, the 42 extent to which the planned business activity is unrepresented or under- 43 represented in the community, and whether the project involves a busi- 44 ness interested in relocating from outside the state of New York. 45 (b) Job creation. A decision to fund a project shall be based on the 46 number of jobs to be created or retained by the proposed project, the 47 range of projected salaries and benefits associated with jobs to be 48 created, and the benchmarks and timeframes to be used by the project to 49 determine whether it is meeting projected job creation and retention 50 goals. 51 (c) The financial viability of the project. Approval for funding shall 52 consider the extent to which the viability and success of the project is 53 dependent on financial assistance from the authority. The authority 54 shall also consider the amount and type of financial assistance being 55 requested, the amount and type of private financing required, the amount 56 and type of capital investment to be provided by the project applicant, S. 3368 21 1 and any prior financial assistance provided to the project or to the 2 project applicant. 3 (d) Economic benefits. Funding decisions shall consider the potential 4 economic and financial impact of the project on existing businesses in 5 the area, on the affected tax jurisdictions, and on the local labor 6 market. 7 (e) Legal issues. Consideration shall be given to the project appli- 8 cant's record of compliance with applicable laws and regulations. 9 2. The project application review and approval criteria shall be 10 reviewed and approved annually at a regular meeting of the authority and 11 made available to the public on the authority's website. 12 3. The authority shall provide the director of the authorities budget 13 office with an electronic copy of the application and project review and 14 approval criteria within thirty days of their adoption or revision. 15 4. The authority shall retain a written record of the evaluation of 16 each project application to document its decision to provide or deny 17 financial assistance. 18 § 2307-b. Financial assistance agreement. 1. The authority shall enter 19 into a written agreement with the project applicant prior to providing 20 financial assistance. The agreement shall include the following informa- 21 tion: 22 (a) a description of the amount and type of financial assistance to be 23 provided by the authority, including a description and the value of 24 property conveyed at less than fair market value; 25 (b) a description of the amount of financing to be provided by the 26 project applicant, including the amount and type of capital investment 27 to be provided; 28 (c) the purpose of the project; 29 (d) the amount, types, sources and commitments of any private financ- 30 ing; 31 (e) the projected number of new full-time and part-time positions 32 expected to be created over the period of financial assistance, and an 33 estimated schedule by year of when those positions will be created; 34 (f) the number and types of full-time and part-time jobs to be 35 retained, and the number of filled positions at the project as of the 36 date the agreement is executed; 37 (g) the types and value of other forms of financial assistance 38 provided to the project or requested by the project applicant from other 39 state or local government agencies or authorities; and 40 (h) the penalties to be imposed on the project applicant if the terms 41 of the agreement are not met. 42 2. The length of a financial assistance agreement shall be limited to 43 no more than five years; provided however that the agreement may be 44 renewed for up to five additional years if the authority determines that 45 the project applicant has acted in good faith to meet the terms and 46 conditions of the agreement. In no event may financial assistance in the 47 form of a loan or exemption from taxation be provided to a project for 48 more than ten years. 49 3. The financial assistance agreement shall be made available to the 50 public on the website of the authority. 51 4. The authority shall adopt a methodology to evaluate the conformance 52 of each assisted project to the terms and conditions of the financial 53 assistance agreement. This methodology shall be made available to the 54 public on the authority's website. 55 § 2307-c. Recapture of certain financial assistance. 1. The authority, 56 pursuant to the terms and conditions of its financial assistance agree- S. 3368 22 1 ment, may recapture financial assistance to a project from the proceeds 2 of bonds issued by the authority, mortgage recording tax exemptions, or 3 local sales or compensating use tax exemptions if (a) the project 4 violates state or federal tax law, labor law, environmental protection 5 law, or contract law, or any state or federal rule or regulation imple- 6 menting such law, as determined by a court of competent jurisdiction or 7 administrative tribunal, provided that such court or tribunal concludes 8 that the violation would cause material harm to the economy or quality 9 of life of the community; or (b) all or part of the project's business 10 activity or workforce is moved to a location outside the community 11 served by the authority and by doing so violates the terms and condi- 12 tions of its financial assistance agreement. 13 2. An authority which elects to initiate the recapture of financial 14 assistance pursuant to subdivision one of section eight hundred fifty- 15 nine-d of the general municipal law must notify the recipient of such 16 financial assistance in writing that it is in default of its financial 17 assistance agreement and may direct the recipient of financial assist- 18 ance to repay up to the full amount of such financial assistance 19 received as of the date of the written notice plus interest at the rate 20 set forth in section five thousand four of the civil practice law and 21 rules. 22 3. Financial assistance recaptured pursuant to this section and any 23 interest paid shall be redistributed to affected tax jurisdictions in 24 proportion to the amount of real property tax and other taxes which 25 would have been received by each affected tax jurisdiction had the 26 project not been tax exempt. Unless otherwise agreed to in writing by an 27 affected tax jurisdiction, the authority shall not retain any portion of 28 such funds as an administrative or project fee. 29 § 2307-d. Wages and standards. Whenever a recipient of financial 30 assistance from the authority enters into a contract, subcontract, lease 31 or other agreement for or in connection with the construction, demoli- 32 tion, reconstruction, rehabilitation, repair, or renovation of an 33 assisted project, the recipient of financial assistance shall pay work- 34 ers engaged in such work no less than the prevailing rate of wage and 35 supplements under article eight of the labor law. 36 § 17. Section 2315 of the public authorities law, as amended by chap- 37 ter 357 of the laws of 1993, subdivision 1 as amended by chapter 646 of 38 the laws of 2024, and subdivision 2 as amended by chapter 32 of the laws 39 of 2023, is amended to read as follows: 40 § 2315. Uniform [tax exemption] financial assistance policy. 1. The 41 authority shall [establish] adopt a uniform [tax exemption] financial 42 assistance policy, [with input from] subject to the approval of affected 43 local taxing jurisdictions, which shall be applicable to provisions of 44 financial assistance pursuant to section twenty-three hundred seven of 45 this title and shall provide guidelines for the claiming of real proper- 46 ty, mortgage recording, and sales tax exemptions. Such guidelines shall 47 include, but not be limited to: period of exemption; payments in lieu of 48 taxes as a percentage of [exemption] taxes that would have been levied 49 by or on behalf of affected tax jurisdictions if the project was not 50 exempt by reason of authority involvement; types of projects for which 51 exemptions may be claimed; procedures for payments in lieu of taxes and 52 instances in which real property appraisals are to be performed as a 53 part of an application for tax exemption; in addition, the authority in 54 adopting such policy shall consider such issues as: the extent to which 55 a project will create or retain permanent, private sector jobs; the 56 estimated value of any tax exemption to be provided; whether affected S. 3368 23 1 tax jurisdictions should be reimbursed by the project occupant if a 2 project does not fulfill the purposes for which an exemption was 3 provided; the impact of a proposed project on existing and proposed 4 businesses and economic development projects in the vicinity; the amount 5 of private sector investment generated or likely to be generated by the 6 proposed project; the demonstrated public support for the proposed 7 project; the likelihood of accomplishing the proposed project in a time- 8 ly fashion; the effect of the proposed project upon the environment; the 9 extent to which the project will utilize, to the fullest extent practi- 10 cable and economically feasible, resource conservation, energy efficien- 11 cy, green technologies, and alternative and renewable energy measures; 12 the extent to which the project will provide onsite child daycare facil- 13 ities; the extent to which the proposed project will require the 14 provision of additional services, including, but not limited to addi- 15 tional educational, transportation, police, emergency medical or fire 16 services; and the extent to which the proposed project will provide 17 additional sources of revenue for municipalities and school districts. 18 The adopted uniform financial assistance policy shall be provided to the 19 chief executive officer and members of the governing body of each 20 affected tax jurisdiction and shall be made available for public 21 inspection at the authority's office and on the authority's website upon 22 its adoption. 23 2. The authority shall [establish a procedure] adopt criteria for 24 deviation from the uniform [tax exemption] financial assistance policy 25 required pursuant to this section which shall be subject to the approval 26 of affected local tax jurisdictions. The authority shall set forth in 27 writing the reasons for deviation from such policy, and shall further 28 notify by certified mail, return receipt requested or an electronic 29 correspondence with a read-receipt, the affected local taxing jurisdic- 30 tions of the proposed deviation from such policy and the reasons there- 31 for not less than sixty days before such deviation from the uniform 32 financial assistance policy shall take effect. When the affected tax 33 jurisdiction is a school district, the authority shall notify by certi- 34 fied mail, return receipt requested or an electronic correspondence with 35 a read-receipt, the district clerk and district superintendent of each 36 affected school district. 37 § 18. Subdivision 1 of section 2976 of the public authorities law, as 38 amended by section 1 of part C of chapter 19 of the laws of 2010, is 39 amended to read as follows: 40 1. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, public benefit 41 corporations (which for purposes of this section shall include indus- 42 trial development agencies created pursuant to title one of article 43 eighteen-A of the general municipal law or any other provision of law 44 and the New York city housing development corporation created pursuant 45 to article twelve of the private housing finance law) which issue bonds, 46 notes or other obligations and not-for-profit corporations that issue 47 bonds on behalf of the state or a political subdivision thereof shall 48 pay to the state a bond issuance charge upon the issuance of such bonds 49 in an amount determined pursuant to subdivision two of this section. 50 Such charge shall be paid to the state department of taxation and 51 finance, upon forms prescribed therefor, no later than fifteen days from 52 the end of the month within which such bonds are issued. 53 § 19. The not-for-profit corporation law is amended by adding a new 54 section 206 to read as follows: 55 § 206. Financial assistance agreement. S. 3368 24 1 1. A corporation, including a local development corporation, deter- 2 mined to be a local authority pursuant to subdivision two of section two 3 and paragraph (j) of subdivision one of section six of the public 4 authorities law that provides financial assistance to a project in the 5 form of a grant, loan, exemption from taxation, or contribution for the 6 public purpose of relieving or reducing unemployment, promoting and 7 marketing job opportunities, or supporting the formation, relocation, 8 expansion, or retention of business shall enter into a written agreement 9 with the project applicant prior to providing financial assistance. 10 2. The agreement shall include the following information: 11 (a) a description of the amount and type of financial assistance to be 12 provided by the corporation, including a description and the value of 13 property conveyed at less than fair market value; 14 (b) a description of the amount of financing to be provided by the 15 project applicant, including the amount and type of capital investment 16 to be provided; 17 (c) the purpose of the project; 18 (d) the amount, types, sources and commitments of any private financ- 19 ing; 20 (e) the projected number of new full-time and part-time positions 21 expected to be created over the period of financial assistance, and an 22 estimated schedule by year of when those positions will be created; 23 (f) the number and types of full-time and part-time jobs to be 24 retained, and the number of filled positions at the project as of the 25 date the agreement is executed; 26 (g) the types and value of other forms of financial assistance 27 provided to the project or requested by the project applicant from other 28 state or local government agencies or authorities; and 29 (h) the penalties to be imposed on the project applicant if the terms 30 of the agreement are not met. 31 3. The length of a financial assistance agreement shall be limited to 32 no more than five years; provided however that the agreement may be 33 renewed for up to five additional years if the corporation determines 34 that the project applicant has acted in good faith to meet the terms and 35 conditions of the agreement. In no event may financial assistance in the 36 form of a loan or exemption from taxation be provided to a project for 37 more than ten years. 38 4. The financial assistance agreement shall be made available to the 39 public on the website of the corporation. 40 5. The corporation shall adopt a methodology to evaluate the conform- 41 ance of each assisted project to the terms and conditions of the finan- 42 cial assistance agreement. This methodology shall be made available to 43 the public on the corporation's website. 44 6. (a) The corporation, pursuant to the terms and conditions of its 45 financial assistance agreement, may recapture financial assistance to a 46 project from grants, loans, real property tax exemptions, mortgage 47 recording tax exemptions, or local sales or compensating use tax 48 exemptions if (i) the project violates state or federal tax law, labor 49 law, environmental protection law, or contract law, or any state or 50 federal rule or regulation implementing such law, as determined by a 51 court of competent jurisdiction or administrative tribunal, provided 52 that such court or tribunal concludes that the violation would cause 53 material harm to the economy or quality of life of the community; or 54 (ii) all or part of the project's business activity or workforce is 55 moved to a location outside the community served by the corporation and S. 3368 25 1 by doing so violates the terms and conditions of its financial assist- 2 ance agreement. 3 (b) A corporation which elects to initiate the recapture of financial 4 assistance pursuant to subdivision one of this section must notify the 5 recipient of such financial assistance in writing that it is in default 6 of its financial assistance agreement and may direct the recipient of 7 financial assistance to repay up to the full amount of such financial 8 assistance received as of the date of the written notice plus interest 9 at the rate set forth in section five thousand four of the civil prac- 10 tice law and rules. 11 (c) Financial assistance recaptured pursuant to this section and any 12 interest paid shall be redistributed to affected tax jurisdictions in 13 proportion to the amount of real property tax and other taxes which 14 would have been received by each affected tax jurisdiction had the 15 project not been tax exempt. Unless otherwise agreed to in writing by an 16 affected tax jurisdiction, the corporation shall not retain any portion 17 of such funds as an administrative or project fee. 18 7. Wages and standards. Whenever a recipient of financial assistance 19 from the corporation enters into a contract, subcontract, lease or other 20 agreement for or in connection with the construction, demolition, recon- 21 struction, rehabilitation, repair, or renovation of an assisted project, 22 the recipient of financial assistance shall pay workers engaged in such 23 work no less than the prevailing rate of wage and supplements under 24 article eight of the labor law. 25 8. For the purposes of this section, "project" shall mean any land, 26 any building or other improvement, and all real and personal properties 27 located within the state of New York and within or outside or partially 28 within and partially outside the municipality for whose benefit the 29 agency was created, including, but not limited to, machinery, equipment 30 and other facilities deemed necessary or desirable in connection there- 31 with, or incidental thereto, whether or not now in existence or under 32 construction, which shall be suitable for manufacturing, warehousing, 33 research, commercial or industrial purposes or other economically sound 34 purposes identified and called for to implement a state designated urban 35 cultural park management plan as provided in title G of the parks, 36 recreation and historic preservation law and which may include or mean 37 an industrial pollution control facility, a recreation facility, educa- 38 tional or cultural facility, a horse racing facility, a railroad facili- 39 ty or an automobile racing facility, provided, however, that no agency 40 shall use its funds or provide financial assistance in respect of any 41 project wholly or partially outside the municipality for whose benefit 42 the agency was created without the prior consent thereto by the govern- 43 ing body or bodies of all the other municipalities in which a part or 44 parts of the project is, or is to be, located, and such portion of the 45 project located outside such municipality for whose benefit the agency 46 was created shall be contiguous with the portion of the project inside 47 such municipality. 48 § 20. Paragraphs (a), (b) and (d) of section 1411 of the not-for-pro- 49 fit corporation law, paragraph (a) as amended by chapter 847 of the laws 50 of 1970 and paragraph (b) as amended by chapter 549 of the laws of 2013, 51 are amended to read as follows: 52 (a) Purposes. 53 This section shall provide an additional and alternate method of 54 incorporation or reincorporation of not-for-profit corporations for any 55 of the purposes set forth in this paragraph [and shall not be deemed to 56 alter, impair or diminish the purposes, rights, powers or privileges of S. 3368 26 1 any corporation heretofore or hereafter incorporated under this section 2 or under the stock or business corporation laws]. Corporations may be 3 incorporated or reincorporated under this section as not-for-profit 4 local development corporations operated for the exclusively charitable 5 or public purposes of relieving and reducing unemployment, promoting and 6 providing for additional and maximum employment, bettering and maintain- 7 ing job opportunities, instructing or training individuals to improve or 8 develop their capabilities for such jobs, carrying on scientific 9 research for the purpose of aiding a community or geographical area by 10 attracting new industry to the community or area or by encouraging the 11 development of, or retention of, an industry in the community or area[, 12 and lessening the burdens of government and acting in the public inter- 13 est, and any]. Any one or more counties, cities, towns or villages of 14 the state, or any combination thereof, or the New York job development 15 authority in exercising its power under the public authorities law to 16 encourage the organization of local development corporations, may cause 17 such corporations to be incorporated by public officers or private indi- 18 viduals or reincorporated upon compliance with the requirements of this 19 section, and it is hereby found, determined and declared that in carry- 20 ing out said purposes and in exercising the powers conferred by para- 21 graph (b) of this section such corporations will be acting in the public 22 interest and performing an essential governmental function. 23 (b) Type of corporation. 24 A local development corporation [is] incorporated for one or more of 25 the purposes described in paragraph (a) of this section shall be a char- 26 itable corporation under this chapter. 27 (d) Purchase or lease of real property owned by a county, city, town 28 or village. 29 (1) The local legislative body of a county, city, town or village or, 30 if there is a board of estimate in a city, then the board of estimate, 31 may by resolution determine that specifically described real property 32 owned by the county, city, town or village is not required for use by 33 such county, city, town or village and authorize the county, city, town 34 or village to sell or lease such real property to a local development 35 corporation incorporated or reincorporated under this article; provided, 36 however, that title to such land be not declared inalienable as a forest 37 preserve or a parkland. 38 (2) Notwithstanding the provisions of any general, special or local 39 law, charter or ordinance to the contrary, no such sale or lease may be 40 made without appraisal, public notice, (except as provided in subpara- 41 graph (4)) or public bidding [for such price or rental and upon such 42 terms as may be agreed upon between the county, city, town or village 43 and said local development corporation]; provided, however, that in case 44 of a lease the term may not exceed ninety-nine years and provided, 45 further, that in cities having a population of one million or more, no 46 such sale or lease shall be made without the approval of a majority of 47 the members of the borough [improvement] board of the borough in which 48 such real property is located. 49 (3) Before any sale or lease to a local development corporation incor- 50 porated or reincorporated under this article shall be authorized, a 51 public hearing shall be held by the local legislative body[, or by the 52 board of estimate, as the case may be,] to consider the proposed sale or 53 lease. 54 (4) Notice of such hearing shall be published at least ten days before 55 the date set for the hearing in such publication and in such manner as 56 may be designated by the local legislative body[, or the board of esti- S. 3368 27 1 mate as the case may be]. Such notice shall include a description of the 2 real property proposed to be sold or leased; a statement of the esti- 3 mated fair market value of the real property proposed to be sold or 4 leased; the value of the financial consideration to be received by the 5 county, city, town or village from such sale or lease of the real prop- 6 erty; and a statement of the intended use or disposition of such real 7 property by the local development corporation. 8 (5) A local development corporation, incorporated or reincorporated 9 under this section, which purchases or leases real property from a coun- 10 ty, city, town or village, shall not, without the written approval of 11 the county, city, town or village, use such real property for any 12 purpose except the purposes set forth in the certificate of incorpo- 13 ration or reincorporation of said local development corporation. In the 14 event such real property is used in violation of the restrictions of 15 this paragraph, the attorney-general may bring an action or special 16 proceeding to enjoin the unauthorized use. 17 § 21. Paragraphs (e), (f), (g), (h), and (i) of section 1411 of the 18 not-for-profit corporation law are relettered paragraphs (f), (g), (h), 19 (i), and (j) and a new paragraph (e) is added to read as follows: 20 (e) Contracts with municipalities. 21 Any contract or other agreement between a local development corpo- 22 ration and a municipality or state authority or local authority for one 23 or more of the purposes described in paragraph (a) of this section 24 shall: (i) cause the local development corporation to be defined as a 25 local authority pursuant to subdivision two of section two of the public 26 authorities law; (ii) provide for the municipality or state authority or 27 local authority to receive fair and adequate consideration for the 28 services provided by the local development corporation; (iii) be subject 29 to the requirements of article five-A of the general municipal law; and 30 (iv) have a term not to exceed ten years, subject to one or more 31 renewals for a term not to exceed ten years upon the mutual consent of 32 the parties; provided however that a contract with a municipality shall 33 not be used to finance the municipality's operations or to acquire or 34 improve an asset for use of the municipality. 35 § 22. Paragraph (j) of section 1411 of the not-for-profit corporation 36 law, as relettered by section twenty-one of this act, is amended to read 37 as follows: 38 (j) Effect of section. 39 Corporations incorporated or reincorporated under this section shall 40 be organized and operated exclusively for the purposes set forth in 41 paragraph (a) of this section, shall have, in addition to the powers 42 otherwise conferred by law, the powers conferred by paragraph (c) of 43 this section and shall be subject to all the restrictions and limita- 44 tions imposed by [paragraph (e) and paragraph (g)] paragraphs (c), (d), 45 (e), (h) and (i) of this section. In so far as the provisions of this 46 section are inconsistent with the provisions of any other law, general 47 or special, the provisions of this section shall be controlling as to 48 corporations incorporated or reincorporated hereunder. 49 § 23. Federal preemption and severability. The provisions of each 50 section of this act shall be deemed severable, and the declaration by a 51 court of competent jurisdiction that any part thereof is preempted or 52 otherwise invalid shall not affect the remaining parts thereof. 53 § 24. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 54 have become a law, or January 1, 2026, whichever shall come first; 55 provided, however, that section fifteen of this act shall apply to bonds 56 issued or re-issued on or after the effective date of this act.